Maine, session 132, LD1247.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §4364-D is enacted to read:
§4364-D. Residential areas; municipal sewer and water; designated growth areas; lot
sizes; individual private septic systems
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Dimensional standards" means ordinance provisions relating to lot coverage, road
frontage and setback requirements.
B. "Dwelling unit" means a single-family or multifamily dwelling unit.
C. "Housing development" means a development constructed to provide one or more
dwelling units.
2. Residential areas where municipal sewer and water available. This subsection
applies to residential areas where municipal sewer and water services are available.
A. If a housing development is served by a public, special district or other centrally
managed water system and a public, special district or other comparable sewer system
and is located in an area in which dwelling units are allowed, a municipality must allow
a dwelling unit on a lot with a minimum size of 5,000 square feet and may not require
more than 2 off-street parking spaces for every 3 dwelling units in a housing
development.
B. A municipal ordinance may not establish dimensional standards for dwelling units
under this subsection that are more restrictive than dimensional standards for single-
family dwelling units in effect on October 1, 2023, and a municipal ordinance may not
establish:
(1) A road frontage requirement greater than 50 feet for dwelling units under this
subsection; or
(2) Front, rear or side setback requirements greater than 10 feet for dwelling units
under this subsection.
C. A developer of a housing development under this subsection shall provide written
verification to the municipality that each dwelling unit in the housing development is
connected to adequate sewer and water services before the municipality may certify
the housing development for occupancy. Written verification under this paragraph
must include:
(1) For a dwelling unit that will be connected to a public, special district or other
comparable sewer system, proof of adequate service to support any additional flow
created by the dwelling unit; and
(2) For a dwelling unit that will be connected to a public, special district or other
centrally managed water system, proof of adequate service to support any
additional flow created by the dwelling unit, proof of payment for the connection
and the volume and supply of water required for the dwelling unit.
D. A housing development that will be connected to existing water and sewer
infrastructure under this subsection may not be charged an impact fee or sewer
Page 1 - 132LR1935(01)

412 connection fee greater than a pro rata amount based on the square footage of the new
423 housing development when compared with residential connections in effect at the time.
3. Subdivision requirements. This section may not be construed to exempt a housing
development from the requirements for a division of a tract or parcel of land under
subchapter 4.
4. Restrictive covenants. This section may not be construed to interfere with,
abrogate or annul the validity or enforceability of any valid and enforceable easement,
covenant, deed restriction or other agreement or instrument between private parties that
imposes greater restrictions than those provided in this section, as long as the easement,
covenant, deed restriction or other agreement or instrument does not abrogate rights under
the United States Constitution or the Constitution of Maine.
5. Shoreland zoning. A housing development under this section must comply with
shoreland zoning requirements established by the Department of Environmental Protection
under Title 38, chapter 3, subchapter 1, article 2-B and municipal shoreland zoning
ordinances.
6. Individual private septic systems. This section may not be construed to exempt a
housing development from minimum lot size requirements under Title 12, chapter 423-A,
as applicable.